North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-02 Game and Fish Department

20.1-02-01.
Director of the game and fish department — Office to be maintained — Appointment — Term — Removal.

The governor shall appoint the director of the game and fish department. The director holds office for a term of four years beginning on the first day of July after the governor’s election and until a successor is appointed and qualified. The director is subject to removal by the governor for cause only.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1989, ch. 277, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 9.

Cross-References.

Definition of terms used in title, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-02.

20.1-02-02.
Oath of director.

Before entering upon that individual’s duties and within ten days after the date of appointment, the director shall take and file the oath prescribed for civil officers.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1991, ch. 231, § 10; 2005, ch. 261, § 4.

Cross-References.

Bonds of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

Filing of bonds issued in lieu of those issued by the state bonding fund, see N.D.C.C. § 54-09-02.

Oath of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

20.1-02-03.
Compensation and expenses of director — Audit and payment.

The salary of the director must be within the amount appropriated for salaries by the legislative assembly. The director must be reimbursed for the necessary expenses incurred by the director in the performance of the director’s duties. The director’s salary and expenses must be paid out of the game and fish fund and must be audited and paid in the same manner as the salary and expenses of other state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1981, ch. 535, § 6; 1991, ch. 231, § 11.

Cross-References.

Monthly payment of salaries, see N.D.C.C. § 54-06-06.

Traveling expenses, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-08-03 to 44-08-05.1, 54-06-09.

20.1-02-04.
Duties of director.

The director shall:

Maintain an office in Bismarck.

Adopt rules necessary to the conduct of the department.

Keep an accurate record of all the transactions and expenditures of the department and submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04.

Enforce state laws involving wildlife.

Collect and distribute statistics and information germane to this title and publish information and reports, including a monthly bulletin, for the education of the public in conservation matters.

Examine all waters of the state and, wherever suitable waters are found, arrange to plant, stock, or deposit available fish, spawn, or fry.

Cooperate with the United States fish and wildlife service, or any other appropriate federal agency, and make applications for fish, spawn, and fry, to apportion and deposit in waters of the state.

Cooperate with and assist clubs and individuals in stocking the waters of this state with fish.

Remove or take from any public waters containing a surplus of fish any reasonable quantity of fish for stocking other public waters, hatching or propagating purposes, or exchange with other states and countries.

Control, construct, mark, designate, manage, and have charge of all state fish hatcheries, state game farms, game refuges, and game reserves owned, leased, or controlled for the propagation and protection of game birds, game animals, and fish.

Supervise the breeding, propagation, capture, distribution, and preservation of game birds, game animals, and fish as the director deems advisable.

Adopt rules necessary for carrying out section 20.1-10-01 and these rules have the force of law after one publication in the daily newspapers of this state.

Provide the necessary blank forms for making applications for licenses of all kinds and distribute them among those authorized to sell licenses.

Keep a record of all permits issued for the purpose of propagation and domestication of game birds or protected animals.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1973, ch. 403, § 15; 1975, ch. 466, § 16; 1991, ch. 231, § 12; 1991, ch. 232, § 4; 1995, ch. 350, § 15; 2011, ch. 172, § 1; 2013, ch. 190, § 1; 2017, ch. 176, § 1, effective April 18, 2017.

Cross-References.

Big game hunting license, seals to be furnished with each license, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-05-07.

County auditors to be furnished with forms for making reports, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-19.

Propagation of protected animals and game birds, see N.D.C.C. 20.1-09.

Supervision of game refuges, see N.D.C.C. ch. 20.1-11.

Taxidermy, issuance of license to practice, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-15.

20.1-02-05.
Powers of director.

The director may:

Fix the salaries and the necessary travel and other expenses of department personnel subject to law and legislative appropriations.

Employ any part-time personnel necessary to run the director’s office and remove the employees at will. Salaries and necessary traveling and other expenses of these appointees must be authorized, audited, and paid in the same manner as salaries and expenses of state officers.

Accept from any person, or gather, or purchase, fish, spawn, or fry, for distribution in state waters.

Take alive at any time, under the director’s personal supervision or under the personal supervision of any of the director’s bonded appointees, any birds or animals for propagation purposes or for exchange with other states and foreign countries for game birds and animals of other species.

Order additional protection for any fish with an open season when, after investigation, the director finds danger of extinction, undue depletion in any waters, or to aid in the propagation and protection of immature fish, by prescribing how, how many, where, and when the fish may be taken. The orders have the force of law.

Take or cause to be taken at any time from any state public waters any suckers, carp, or pickerel.

With the governor’s approval, purchase, lease, or, subject to chapter 32-15, condemn real estate, when it is required to carry out this title, and sell it when it is no longer required, in the name of the state.

Lease up to ninety-nine years any department land, for the purpose of development and improvement, to any nonprofit corporation, upon consideration of specified improvements to be made by the corporation and other improvements the department and the corporation may agree upon. The lease must provide that all funds received by the corporation through lease of the property be expended upon the leased premises for development and improvements. The corporation has the authority, subject to approval by the director, to sublease the premises for cabin sites and other recreational purposes. Upon termination of the lease, the leased property, together with all improvements, reverts to the department.

Secure specimens of game birds, animals, and fish for breeding purposes by purchase or otherwise and by exchange with the game commissions or state game wardens of other states or countries.

Issue special permits to shoot wildlife from a stationary motor vehicle upon application from individuals who are physically unable to walk for purposes of hunting or taking wildlife or who have lost the use of an arm at or below the elbow. The application must be accompanied by a statement from a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse which verifies the individual’s condition, and if used to hunt on lands controlled by the board of university and school lands, must designate the land on which the individual intends to hunt. The permittee must have permission from the lessee and the commissioner of university and school lands to hunt on lands controlled by the board of university and school lands. A permit issued under this subsection allows the permittee to drive, or to be driven, onto any land for the purposes of hunting wildlife, except that neither any other passenger within the vehicle nor the driver, if someone other than the permittee, may be a hunter, unless the other individual also is a permittee. If the land is privately owned and if the permittee is not going to drive or be driven along an established road or trail, the permittee first must obtain the consent of the owner or lessee to hunt on the land in the manner provided in this title.

Issue to any individual who is blind, is a paraplegic, or who has lost the use of one or both arms a special permit to hunt game with a crossbow if that individual otherwise complies with and qualifies under the licensing and other provisions of this title. Battery-powered and electronic-lighted sight pins and telescopic sights not exceeding a maximum power of eight may be attached to crossbows used for hunting under this subsection. However, an individual who is blind and who receives a special permit to hunt game with a crossbow under this subsection may hunt only on a preserve or area approved by the director. For purposes of this subsection, an individual who is blind means an individual who is totally blind, whose central visual acuity does not exceed twenty/two hundred in the better eye with corrective lenses, or in whom the widest diameter of the visual field is no greater than twenty degrees.

Issue any resident license and adopt rules if necessary to carry out resident licensing for each of the following, except a lottery permit or license may be issued only to an individual who qualifies as a resident under subdivision a:

A resident who is eligible for a license under this title, except that the director shall issue a license on proper application. A resident who is eighteen years of age or older must submit a valid driver’s license number from this state or valid nondriver photo identification number issued by this state before the director may issue a license.

An individual who has come to the state with a bona fide intention of becoming a resident, even though that individual has not been a resident of this state for the required time period immediately preceding the application for the license. However, an individual who is eighteen years of age or older is not eligible for a resident license under this subsection unless that individual first produces a driver’s license number from this state or a nondriver photo identification number issued by this state and submits an affidavit of a bona fide resident setting forth the actual conditions of residency. An individual is not eligible for a resident license under this subsection if the individual maintains a valid resident hunting-related or fishing-related license from another state or country, unless the license is a lifetime license.

An individual who is a member of the United States armed forces and who is within the state on duty or leave.

An employee of the United States fish and wildlife service or the conservation department of any state or province of Canada in the state to advise or consult with the department.

A nonresident full-time student living in this state who is attending an institution under the jurisdiction of the state board of higher education, a private institution of higher education, or a tribal college. A license may not be issued under this subdivision unless a valid student identification number accompanies the application.

A resident of this state who applies for a resident deer hunting license, is a member of the United States armed forces stationed outside this state, who shows proof of North Dakota residence, including a driver’s license number from this state or a nondriver photo identification number from this state, and who pays the appropriate licensing fee, except the director shall issue the resident deer hunting license on proper application. A deer license issued to a member of the United States armed forces under this subdivision must be issued without being subject to the lottery for deer hunting licenses.

Adopt rules, and issue permits for the transporting or introducing of fish, fish eggs, small game, big game, or fur-bearers after determining that the fish, fish eggs, birds, or animals have been properly inspected for disease, and that the transplanting or introduction will be in compliance with state laws and rules. No person may transplant or introduce any fish or fish eggs into any of the public waters of this state, or transplant or introduce any species of small game, big game, or fur-bearers into this state without obtaining a permit from the director.

Pursuant to section 4-01-17.1, cooperate with the agriculture commissioner, the United States fish and wildlife service, and other agencies in the destruction of predatory animals, destructive birds, and injurious field rodents. The director may adopt rules in accordance with organized and systematic plans of the department of the interior for the destruction of these birds and animals. The director may determine the necessity and issue permits and rules and regulations therefor for the operation and use of private aircraft to assist in the destruction of the above birds and animals and aid in the administration or protection of land, water, wildlife, livestock, domesticated animals, human life, or crops.

Exercise authority to establish programs and rules and administer state and federal funds provided to the state for the preservation and management of resident species determined by the director to be threatened or endangered species of wildlife. The authority exercised must be in compliance with the Endangered Species Act of 1973, Public Law 93-205. Any person who violates rules adopted under this subsection is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Provide for the funding of a private land habitat and access improvement program with moneys derived from the interest earned on the game and fish fund and habitat restoration stamp fees. The director shall place these funds in a special fund called the “game and fish department private land habitat and access improvement fund”.

Carry out a private land habitat and access improvement program by:

Entering cost-sharing, habitat enhancement, and access agreements with landowners or agencies working on private land to help defray all or a portion of their share of local, state, or federally sponsored conservation practices considered beneficial to fish and wildlife.

Leasing and developing fish and wildlife habitat or sport fishing areas on private land. Except for purposes of subdivision i, public access to leased land may not be prohibited.

Carrying out practices or designating an individual to carry out practices or authorizing or having the designee authorize landowners to carry out practices that will alleviate depredations caused by predatory animals and big game animals.

Publishing a brochure on an annual basis describing areas funded from the game and fish department private land habitat and access improvement fund which are open to public access in this state.

Receiving advice from the game and fish advisory board concerning expenditures from the game and fish department private land habitat and access improvement fund.

Working with livestock producers experiencing chronic deer depredation problems to develop site-specific deer depredation management plans.

Giving first consideration to producers impacted by deer foraging on stored winter forage when purchasing winter deer management supplies.

Making available the sum of one million dollars from each biennial game and fish department appropriation to be used to provide feeding and other winter management practices to alleviate depredation caused by big game animals. Any unexpended funds under this subdivision, up to two million dollars, are not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and may be carried forward for expenditure in future bienniums.

Making available the sum of one hundred thousand dollars from each biennial game and fish department appropriation to be used for food plots on private property for the purpose of providing winter feed. These food plots are not subject to public access considerations.

Subject to prior approval of the attorney general, lease or exchange lands under the director’s jurisdiction or control which are deemed necessary for the improved management of wildlife resources.

Subject to prior approval of the attorney general, impose any conditions or reservations to the leases or exchanges as the director determines necessary.

Adopt rules and issue permits for conducting fishing contests involving public waters of the state. The director by rule shall define the term “fishing contest” and shall set criteria for which a fishing contest permit is required. The director may deny permits. No person may conduct a fishing contest on public waters without first receiving a permit issued by the director.

Issue duplicates of lost or destroyed game and fish licenses or permits. The procedure for reissuing the licenses or permits and fees to be charged must be prescribed by the director by rule.

Establish noncriminal penalties for any rules adopted by the director. The maximum noncriminal penalty that may be set by the director is a fine of two hundred fifty dollars. Violation of any rule not designated as having a noncriminal penalty is considered a criminal violation as established in the appropriate chapter of this title.

Issue, as a means of encouraging and promoting economic development in this state, complimentary fishing licenses to nonresident visiting dignitaries. The circumstances and conditions of complimentary fishing licenses issued must be determined by the director. The number of complimentary licenses may not exceed fifty licenses per year. The director shall determine the visiting dignitaries to be of national or international stature before they are eligible for complimentary licenses.

Carry out a coyote depredation prevention program by conducting practices that will alleviate depredations caused by coyotes.

Issue, as a means of rewarding dedication to teaching firearm hunter safety, complimentary lifetime resident certificates and combination licenses provided under section 20.1-03-11.1 to resident certified hunter education volunteer instructors. Eligible persons must have served as a lead or assistant certified hunter education volunteer instructor in this state for a minimum of one course in each of thirty years. The license is known as the “lifetime combination license” and must be signed by the director and the person receiving the license. The license must be revoked by the director if the licenseholder is convicted of a felony or found to have violated any provision of this title.

Carry out a program that targets waterfowl resting areas within the private lands initiative program which includes payments to private landowners for lease of waterfowl resting areas on private lands that during the term of the lease provides limited public access for the hunting of waterfowl.

Issue free hunting licenses to an organization that sponsors hunting trips for terminally ill children. A license issued under this subsection may be used by an individual sponsored by the organization to hunt the species indicated on the license.

Authorize individuals with valid antlerless deer licenses to take deer on private lands determined by the director to be severely impacted by deer. Before authorizing individuals under this subsection, the director must attempt other measures and determine them to be ineffective. A landowner dissatisfied with a decision of the director under this subsection may submit the decision to the agricultural mediation service for mandatory mediation. A decision of an agricultural mediation service negotiator is subject to review by the credit review board. A decision of the credit review board under this subsection is final. The director may authorize individuals to take deer under this subsection between December first of a year through January fifteenth of the following year.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1973, ch. 204, § 2; 1973, ch. 205, § 2; 1975, ch. 201, § 2; 1975, ch. 203, § 2; 1975, ch. 205, § 2; 1977, ch. 199, § 7; 1977, ch. 201, § 1; 1979, ch. 299, § 1; 1981, ch. 38, § 5; 1981, ch. 255, § 1; 1983, ch. 264, § 1; 1983, ch. 265, § 1; 1983, ch. 266, § 1; 1985, ch. 272, § 8; 1985, ch. 273, § 1; 1987, ch. 271, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 13; 1991, ch. 234, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 226, § 1; 1995, ch. 225, § 1; 1997, ch. 210, § 1; 1999, ch. 217, § 1; 2001, ch. 219, § 1; 2001, ch. 220, § 1; 2001, ch. 221, § 1; 2003, ch. 194, § 1; 2003, ch. 195, § 1; 2003, ch. 196, § 1; 2003, ch. 197, § 1; 2003, ch. 202, § 2; 2005, ch. 207, § 2; 2005, ch. 208, § 1; 2005, ch. 209, § 1; 2005, ch. 210, § 1; 2007, ch. 226, § 1; 2007, ch. 293, § 11; 2011, ch. 173, §§ 2, 3; 2013, ch. 191, § 1; 2015, ch. 176, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 196, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 197, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

The Endangered Species Act of 1973 referenced in this section is compiled at 16 USCS §§ 1531 et seq.

Cross-References.

Eminent domain, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-15.

Monthly payment of salaries, see N.D.C.C. § 54-06-06.

Right to inspect records of taxidermists, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-16.

20.1-02-05.1.
Land acquisitions — Statewide land acquisition plan.

The director shall establish a comprehensive statewide land acquisition plan, subject to approval by the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session. Every land acquisition made by the department exceeding ten acres [4.05 hectares] or ten thousand dollars must be approved by the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9.

Before a land acquisition, the department shall have the land in question appraised by a certified appraiser. The department may not acquire any land for an amount that exceeds the appraised value except for parcels or tracts of land less than forty acres [16.19 hectares] which may be acquired for up to two hundred percent of the appraised value.

Before the appraisal, the director shall give notice of the intent to purchase to every landowner within one mile [1.16 kilometers] of the boundary of the land to be appraised unless the landowner is within the boundary of a city, then the director shall send notice to the governing body of the city or unless the landowner is within the geographical boundary of a rural subdivision where the lots are ten acres [4.04 hectares] or less, then the director shall send notice to the governing body of the township or other governing authority for the rural subdivision. The director shall send notice to the board of county commissioners in the county of the land to be appraised, the board of township supervisors if the land to be appraised is in an organized township, and the governing body of a city within twelve miles [19.32 kilometers] of the boundary of the land to be appraised. The director shall publish notice in the official newspaper of the county of the land to be appraised, once a week for two consecutive weeks. The notice must contain the amount of acreage, the legal description, and the fact that the department intends to purchase the land.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 42, § 5; 2003, ch. 48, § 12; 2009, ch. 17, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2013, ch. 192, § 1; 2019, ch. 438, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

20.1-02-05.2.
Private land access program — Guidelines. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2005, ch. 210, § 4.

20.1-02-06.
Deputy director — Appointment, removal, oath, reports.

The director shall appoint, and may remove at pleasure, a deputy director who is under the director’s direct control and supervision. The deputy, within ten days after the date of that person’s appointment, shall take and file the oath prescribed for civil officers. The oath must be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The deputy director shall make monthly and annual reports to the director in the manner required by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 3; 1991, ch. 231, § 14; 1999, ch. 113, § 6.

Cross-References.

Bonds of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

Filing bonds issued in lieu of those issued by the state bonding fund, see N.D.C.C. § 54-09-02.

Oath of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

20.1-02-07.
Chief game warden, district deputy game wardens, biologists, and technicians — Appointment — Removal.

The director, with the governor’s approval, may appoint the following permanent employees:

A chief game warden who shall enforce all state game and fish laws and supervise all deputy game wardens.

District deputy game wardens, assigned by the director, to enforce all state game and fish laws within specific appropriation limitations.

Biologists and technicians with specialized training and experience to perform duties specified by the director.

The appointees may be removed for cause only and in the manner specified by law.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1977, ch. 202, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 15.

20.1-02-08.
Oath of chief game warden.

The chief game warden, within ten days of appointment, shall take the oath prescribed for civil officers and file it with the secretary of state.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1999, ch. 113, § 7.

Cross-References.

Bonds of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

Filing of bonds issued in lieu of those issued by the state bonding fund, see N.D.C.C. § 54-09-02.

Oath of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

20.1-02-09.
Supervision of chief game warden by director — Records — Reports.

The chief game warden is under the direct control and supervision of the director and shall make monthly and annual reports to the director in a manner required by the director. The chief game warden shall keep a complete and correct record, in a format authorized by the director, of all the chief game warden’s transactions and of the name of each person violating the game and fish laws; the date of that person’s arrest, if applicable; the amount of the fine and costs imposed upon and paid by each person; and the name of the judge before whom that person appeared. The record, when requested, must be open to inspection by the public. The chief game warden shall make a full report to the director within thirty days after the end of each calendar year.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1991, ch. 231, § 16; 2021, ch. 184, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

20.1-02-10.
Special deputy game wardens — Appointment, removal, compensation.

The director may appoint and remove at pleasure, one or more special deputy game wardens in each county. They serve for the time and manner as the director directs. They serve without compensation, but are entitled to a reward pursuant to section 20.1-02-16.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1991, ch. 231, § 17.

20.1-02-11.
Deputy game wardens supervised by director — To make reports.

Each district deputy game warden and each special deputy game warden are under the direct control and supervision of the director, and shall make monthly and annual reports to the director in a manner required by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1991, ch. 231, § 18.

20.1-02-12.
Bond of deputy game wardens. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 113, § 24.

20.1-02-13.
Disqualification of game wardens.

No person who owns or possesses land in this state under lease or contract for hunting purposes, nor that person’s employee or agent, may be appointed or may act as a chief, district, or special deputy game warden.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9.

20.1-02-14.
Writs served and executed by game wardens — Peace officers and others to aid wardens, when.

The director, deputy director, and all wardens and deputy wardens may serve and execute, in the same manner as any sheriff, all warrants and legal process issued by a court in enforcing this title. The officers of the department may call to their aid any sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or other person to enforce this title. All peace officers or other persons, when called upon, shall enforce and aid in enforcing this title.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1985, ch. 151, § 18; 1991, ch. 231, § 19.

Cross-References.

Attorney general, state’s attorneys, sheriffs, constables and peace officers to enforce title, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-04.

20.1-02-14.1.
Uniform complaint and summons — Promise to appear — Penalty.

There is established a uniform complaint and summons that may be used in cases involving violations of this title or other violations of a state law which occur on property that the department owns, leases, or manages or on sovereign lands as defined by section 61-33-01. Whenever the complaint and summons established by this section is used, the provisions of the North Dakota Rules of Criminal Procedure apply. The uniform complaint and summons must be of a form prescribed by the director and approved by the attorney general.

The time of court appearance to be specified in the summons must be at least five days after the issuance of the summons unless the defendant demands an earlier hearing.

Upon receipt from the defendant of written promise to appear at the time and place specified in the summons, the defendant must be released from custody. After signing a promise to appear, the defendant must be given a copy of the uniform complaint and summons. Any person refusing to give a written promise to appear may be arrested if proper cause exists, or proceeded against by complaint and warrant of arrest as provided in the North Dakota Rules of Criminal Procedure.

If an individual fails to appear in court after promising to do so, the court may issue an arrest warrant and in addition to other conditions shall order the department to suspend the individual’s hunting, fishing, and trapping privileges until after the final disposition of the case.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 207, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 20; 2009, ch. 279, § 2.

20.1-02-15.
Police powers of director, deputy director, and bonded appointees of director.

The director, deputy director, and any bonded appointees of the director have the power:

Of a peace officer for the purpose of enforcing this title and any other state laws or rules relating to wildlife.

To make arrests upon view and without warrant for any violation, committed in that person’s presence, of this title and any other state laws or rules relating to wildlife.

To regulate dealers in green furs, propagation or possession of live protected wildlife, taxidermists, shooting preserves, guides and outfitters, commercial fishing operations, private fish hatcheries, and commercial bait vendors. In the regulation of these licensed activities, the premises used to conduct the business and records required by law must be open for inspection at reasonable hours by game and fish law enforcement officers.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1981, ch. 256, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 21; 1991, ch. 232, § 5.

Cross-References.

Warden as general peace officer in enforcing provisions concerning going afield while intoxicated, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-06.

20.1-02-15.1.
Additional powers of director, deputy director, chief game wardens, or district game wardens.

The director, deputy director, chief game wardens, or district game wardens have the power of a peace officer in the following circumstances:

To enforce state laws and rules on any game refuge, game management area, or other land or water owned, leased, or managed by the department and on sovereign lands as defined by section 61-33-01.

When responding to requests from other law enforcement agencies or officers for aid and assistance. For the purposes of this subsection, a request from a law enforcement agency or officer means only a request for assistance as to a particular and singular violation or suspicion of violation of law, and does not constitute a continuous request for assistance outside the purview of enforcement of the provisions of this title.

The powers and duties conferred are supplemental to other powers and duties conferred upon the director, deputy director, chief game wardens, or district game wardens and do not constitute an obligation beyond the regular course of duty of those officers.

To enforce chapter 20.1-15.

To enforce chapter 20.1-13.1.

To enforce chapter 39-24.1.

This section may not be construed to limit the powers or duties of any peace officer within this state.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 300, § 1; 1991, ch. 230, § 3; 1991, ch. 231, § 22; 1991, ch. 254, § 1; 1997, ch. 347, § 3; 2007, ch. 560, § 1.

20.1-02-16.
Director may pay rewards in connection with the conviction of violators — Amounts — Exceptions.

The director, out of legislative reward appropriation, may pay complainants, upon the arrest and conviction of any person violating this title, a reward not to exceed:

One hundred dollars if the offense involves a violation relating to big game.

Fifty dollars if the offense involves a violation relating to game birds, fish, fur-bearers, or protected animals not mentioned in subsection 1.

This section does not apply when the complaint is made or required information is furnished by an officer, employee, or game warden who is regularly employed and who receives a salary from the department, or by a sheriff or other peace officer who receives a regular salary.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1981, ch. 257, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 23.

20.1-02-16.1.
Game and fish fund — Use — Required balance — Budget section approval.

All income of the state game and fish department deposited by the director with the state treasurer must be credited to the state game and fish fund and the fund may be used only by the department. All money derived from the investment of the fund, special accounts, or portions of the fund may be credited to the game and fish department private land habitat and access improvement fund. The department shall spend moneys in the game and fish fund within the limits of legislative appropriations, only to the extent the balance of the fund is not reduced below fifteen million dollars, unless otherwise authorized by the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. Investment of up to fifteen million dollars of the balance of the game and fish fund may be made under the supervision of the state investment board and the moneys must be invested by the investing authority according to the laws relating to state investments. The department shall notify the state investment board of the amount available for investment.

Source:

I.M. approved November 7, 1978, S.L. 1979, ch. 688, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 24; 1999, ch. 41, § 6; 2005, ch. 18, § 9; 2005, ch. 207, § 3; 2019, ch. 42, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 198, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 438, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

20.1-02-16.2.
Nongame wildlife fund established — Uses — Appropriation.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special fund known as the nongame wildlife fund. The fund may be expended subject to appropriation by the legislative assembly to the game and fish department and must be used only for the purposes of preservation, inventory, perpetuation, and conservation of nongame wildlife, natural areas, and nature preserves in this state. The game and fish department shall allocate a portion of the fund to other state agencies for the purpose stated in this section, and with approval of the director. For the purpose of this section, “nongame wildlife” means all species of native animals not commonly taken for sport or commercial purposes and does not include animals determined by the game and fish department to be harmful animals. “Natural areas” and “nature preserves” mean areas as defined in section 55-11-02.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 272, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 25.

20.1-02-16.3.
Small and big game habitat restoration trust fund — Advisory committee — Transfer — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 210, § 5.

20.1-02-16.4.
Clam harvesting privilege fee.

There is hereby imposed, for the grant of the privilege of the right to harvest clams, a privilege fee of ten percent of the market value of clam shells harvested in this state. The fee imposed by this section must be paid to the director for deposit in the game and fish fund. The director may adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for the administration of the fee imposed under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 232, § 6.

20.1-02-16.5.
Motorboat programs and safety account — Use.

The director shall deposit all motorboat license fees in a special account within the game and fish fund to be known as the motorboat programs and safety account. Funds placed in the motorboat programs and safety account may be used only for construction and installation of boat launching facilities, fish cleaning and comfort stations, boating enforcement, boating safety education, and boat licensing administration. All money derived from the investment of the account, or portions of the account, must be credited in accordance with section 20.1-02-16.1.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 227, § 1; 2005, ch. 207, § 4.

20.1-02-16.6.
Motorboat programs and safety account — Transfer from highway tax distribution fund.

Each year in the month of July the state treasurer shall transfer from the highway tax distribution fund, before allocation of the fund under section 54-27-19, to the motorboat programs and safety account an amount equal to two dollars and fifty cents multiplied by the number of motorboats licensed with the game and fish department as of July first of that year.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 226, § 1; 2009, ch. 203, § 1.

20.1-02-16.7.
Aquatic nuisance species program fund.

There is created in the state treasury a special fund known as the aquatic nuisance species program fund. The fund consists of transfers and deposits made in accordance with section 20.1-02-16.1 and section 20.1-13-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

20.1-02-17.
Conditional assent to federal aid projects — Proceeds from license fees and application to be used for administration of department.

North Dakota assents to the Act of Congress entitled “An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in wildlife restoration projects and for other purposes” [Pub. L. 75-415; 50 Stat. 917; 16 U.S.C. 669 et seq.], and the Act of Congress entitled “An Act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in fish restoration and management projects, and for other purposes” [Pub. L. 81-681; 64 Stat. 430; 16 U.S.C. 777 et seq.] subject to the conditions of section 20.1-02-17.1. The director may conduct and establish cooperative wildlife and fish restoration projects as defined in these Acts, in compliance with the Acts and with rules adopted by the federal agency administering these Acts.

Hunting and fishing license fees and application fees assessed under section 20.1-03-12.2 may only be used for departmental programs and administration.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 202, § 9; 1977, ch. 203, § 1; 1985, ch. 278, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 27.

Cross-References.

Deposit of license fees, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-17.

Fees for licenses and permits, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-03-12.